Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Article 2 Establishment of Parentage

15-8.1-201.
Recognized parents.

A person may establish parentage by any of the following:

Giving birth to the child, except as otherwise provided in article 8 of this chapter;

Adoption of the child pursuant to chapter 7 of title 15;

An effective voluntary acknowledgment of parentage under article 3 of this chapter;

An adjudication of parentage under this chapter, including adjudications based on an admission of parentage under §

15-8.1-111

;

A presumption of parentage under article 4 of this chapter, unless the presumption is overcome in a judicial proceeding or a valid denial of parentage is made under article 3 of this chapter;

An adjudication of de facto parentage under article 5 of this chapter;

An adjudication that an alleged genetic parent is a parent under article 6 of this chapter;

Consent to assisted reproduction under article 7 of this chapter; or

Establishment of parentage under article 8 of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-202.
Nondiscrimination.

Every child has the same rights under law as any other child without regard to the marital status or gender of the parents or the circumstances of the birth of the child.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-203.
Consequences of establishment of parentage.

Unless parentage has been terminated by a court order or an exception has been stated explicitly in this chapter, parentage established under this chapter applies for all purposes, including the rights and duties of parentage under the law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-204.
Determination of maternity and paternity.

Provisions of this chapter relating to determination of paternity may apply to determination of maternity as needed to determine parentage consistent with this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-205.
No limitation on child.

Nothing in this chapter limits the right of a child to bring an action to adjudicate parentage.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-206.
Adjudicating competing claims of parentage.

In a proceeding to adjudicate competing claims of parentage or challenges to a child’s parentage by two (2) or more persons, the court shall adjudicate parentage in the best interests of the child, based on the following factors:

The age of the child;

The length of time during which each individual assumed the role of parent of the child;

The nature of the relationship between the child and each individual;

The harm to the child if the relationship between the child and each individual is not recognized;

The basis for each individual’s claim to parentage of the child;

Other considerations arising from the disruption of the relationship between the child and each individual or the likelihood of other harm to the child; and

Other equitable factors that the court deems relevant to the child’s best interests.

If a person challenges parentage based on the results of genetic testing, in addition to the factors listed in subsection (a) of this section, the court shall consider:

The facts surrounding the discovery the individual might not be the genetic parent of the child; and

The length of time between that of the time the individual was placed on notice that the individual might not be a genetic parent and the commencement of the proceeding.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.